Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. Programs and Courses of Instruction Generally.
§ 22.1-206.2.
Instruction concerning post-graduate opportunities for high school students.

As used in this section, “institution of higher education” means each public institution of higher education and each private institution of higher education, as those terms are defined in §

23.1-100

.

The Department shall collect and distribute to school boards and publicly post on its website information that assists high school students in making more informed decisions about their futures after graduating from high school and in doing so ensure that such students are aware of the costs and benefits of different educational and certificate programs. The Department shall annually collect and compile such information in consultation with the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia (the Council) and any other entity that can assist the Department with collecting and compiling such information and shall update its distribution materials accordingly each year. The Department shall post and distribute the information to school boards, with any relevant updates, no later than October 1 each year, and shall provide an annual update to the General Assembly on how such information was distributed. Each school board shall ensure that the information is readily available to each high school student and distributed to each high school student who expresses an interest in attending an institution of higher education or completing another training program described in this section. Information to be collected shall include:

To the extent available from the Council or other entities or sources, the most in-demand occupations in the Commonwealth, including entry wages and common degree levels required or encouraged for entering such occupations, and lists of offerings at institutions of higher education that offer such programs.

The average cost of institutions of higher education, set out by type of institution.

The federal and state scholarship, merit, and need-based aid programs available to students for attending institutions of higher education.

To the extent available from the Council or other entities or sources, the average monthly student loan payment and the average total amount of student loans for individuals who attend institutions of higher education, with such information distinguished by type of institution, to the extent that the Department and the Council can determine such information.

To the extent available from the Council or other entities or sources, the average student loan default rate for students who attend institutions of higher education, to the extent that the Department and the Council can determine such information.

To the extent available from the Council or other entities or sources, information relating to the availability of paid internship and externship opportunities for students attending institutions of higher education with such information distinguished by major or area of study.

The average time that it takes to complete degrees offered by institutions of higher education.

Median annual wages for individuals who graduate from institutions of higher education, distinguished by degree level.

To the extent available from the Council or other entities or sources, the average starting salary for individuals who complete career and technical education programs in the Commonwealth.

The contact information for each institution of higher education.

To the extent available from the Council or other entities or sources, information regarding the degree to which any institutions of higher education that accept public funding align their curricula or programs with the state job market, including the degree to which they contribute to filling the most in-demand jobs in the Commonwealth. The information in this subdivision shall also be included in the annual report sent to the General Assembly described in this subsection.

Any other information that the Department or the Council deem appropriate to assist high school students in weighing the costs and benefits of post-high-school training and education.

History.

2022, cc. 344, 343.

§ 22.1-207.
Physical and health education.

Physical and health education shall be emphasized throughout the public school curriculum by lessons, drills, and physical exercises, and all pupils in the public elementary, middle, and high schools shall receive as part of the educational program such health instruction and physical training as shall be prescribed by the Board of Education and approved by the State Board of Health. Such health instruction shall incorporate standards that recognize the multiple dimensions of health by including mental health and the relationship of physical and mental health so as to enhance student understanding, attitudes, and behavior that promote health, well-being, and human dignity. Such health instruction may include an age-appropriate program of instruction on the safe use of and risks of abuse of prescription drugs that is consistent with curriculum guidelines developed by the Board and approved by the State Board of Health.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-237, 22-243; 1980, c. 559; 1991, c. 178; 2018, cc. 392, 393, 490.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 392 and 393, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall review and update the health Standards of Learning for students in grades nine and 10 to include mental health. In its review, the Board shall consult with mental health experts, including representatives from the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, NAMI Virginia, Mental Health America of Virginia, the Virginia Association of Community Services Boards, and VOCAL.”

Acts 2018, c. 490, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education may consider the curriculum adopted by the School Board of the City of Virginia Beach regarding drugs and the opioid crisis in developing the curriculum guidelines pursuant to this act.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 392 and 393 are identical, and added the second sentence.

The 2018 amendment by c. 490 added the third sentence.

§ 22.1-207.1.
Family life education.

As used in this section, “abstinence education” means an educational or motivational component that has as its exclusive purpose teaching the social, psychological, and health gains to be realized by teenagers’ abstaining from sexual activity before marriage.

The Board of Education shall develop Standards of Learning and curriculum guidelines for a comprehensive, sequential family life education curriculum in grades kindergarten through 12. Such curriculum guidelines shall include instruction as appropriate for the age of the student in family living and community relationships; the benefits, challenges, responsibilities, and value of marriage for men, women, children, and communities; the value of family relationships; abstinence education; the value of postponing sexual activity; the benefits of adoption as a positive choice in the event of an unwanted pregnancy; human sexuality; human reproduction; the prevention of human trafficking, including the human trafficking of children; dating violence, the characteristics of abusive relationships, steps to take to deter sexual assault, the availability of counseling and legal resources, and, in the event of such sexual assault, the importance of immediate medical attention and advice, as well as the requirements of the law; the etiology, prevention, and effects of sexually transmitted diseases; and mental health education and awareness.

All such instruction shall be designed to promote parental involvement, foster positive self-concepts, and provide mechanisms for coping with peer pressure and the stresses of modern living according to the students’ developmental stages and abilities. The Board shall also establish requirements for appropriate training for teachers of family life education, which shall include training in instructional elements to support the various curriculum components.

Each school board shall conduct a review of its family life education curricula at least once every seven years, shall evaluate whether such curricula reflect contemporary community standards, and shall revise such curricula if necessary.

History.

1987, c. 371; 1999, c. 422; 2002, c. 554; 2004, c. 1030; 2007, c. 32; 2008, c. 417; 2009, cc. 437, 583; 2017, c. 692; 2019, c. 595; 2020, c. 687; 2022, c. 459.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 294, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Board of Education shall include advanced directive education in its curriculum framework for the Health Standards of Learning for high school students.”

The 1999 amendment

inserted “abstinence education” following “community relationships” in the first paragraph, and added the last paragraph.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 554 inserted “the benefits of adoption as a positive choice in the event of an unwanted pregnancy” in the second sentence of the first paragraph; and in the second sentence of the second paragraph, deleted “by December 1, 1987” following “establish,” and added “which shall include training in instructional elements to support the various curriculum components.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1030 inserted “steps to take to avoid sexual assault, and the availability of counseling and legal resources, and, in the event of such sexual assault, the importance of immediate medical attention and advice, as well as the requirements of the law” near the end of the first paragraph; and deleted the former third paragraph concerning a fiscal impact analysis by the Board of Education.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 32 inserted “dating violence, the characteristics of abusive relationships” in the middle of the second sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 417, in the first paragraph, added “and mental health education and awareness” to the last sentence and made related changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 437 and 583 are identical, and inserted “the benefits, challenges, responsibilities, and value of marriage for men, women, children, and communities” preceding “abstinence education” in the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 692 inserted subsection designations and transferred the former last paragraph to subsection A; in subsection A, substituted “As used in” for “For the purposes of”;
in subsection B, deleted “by December 1, 1987” preceding “Standards of Learning,” substituted “K” for “kindergarten,” inserted “the value of family relationships” and substituted “deter sexual assault” for “avoid sexual assault”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 595, in subsection B, inserted “the prevention of human trafficking”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 687 added subsection D.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 459 inserted “including the human trafficking of children” in subsection B; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

§ 22.1-207.1:1.
Family life education; certain curricula and Standards of Learning.

Any family life education curriculum offered by a local school division shall require the Standards of Learning objectives related to dating violence and the characteristics of abusive relationships to be taught at least once in middle school and at least twice in high school, as described in the Board’s family life education guidelines.

Any high school family life education curriculum offered by a local school division shall incorporate age-appropriate elements of effective and evidence-based programs on (i) the prevention of dating violence, domestic abuse, sexual harassment, including sexual harassment using electronic means, sexual violence, and human trafficking and (ii) the law and meaning of consent. Such age-appropriate elements of effective and evidence-based programs on the prevention of sexual violence may include instruction that increases student awareness of the fact that consent is required before sexual activity.

Any family life education curriculum offered in any elementary school, middle school, or high school shall incorporate age-appropriate elements of effective and evidence-based programs on the importance of the personal privacy and personal boundaries of other individuals and tools for a student to use to ensure that he respects the personal privacy and personal boundaries of other individuals.

Any family life education curriculum offered by a local school division shall incorporate age-appropriate elements of effective and evidence-based programs on the harmful physical and emotional effects of female genital mutilation; associated criminal penalties; and the rights of the victim, including any civil action pursuant to §

8.01-42.5

.

Any family life education curriculum offered by a local school division may incorporate age-appropriate elements of effective and evidence-based programs on the prevention, recognition, and awareness of child abduction, child abuse, child sexual exploitation, child sexual abuse, and, in any such curriculum offered in high school, human trafficking of children.

History.

2011, c. 634; 2016, c. 434; 2017, cc. 299, 692; 2018, cc. 383, 519; 2019, cc. 372, 595, 596; 2022, c. 459.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 634 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 434 inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 299 added “and may incorporate age-appropriate elements of effective and evidence-based programs on the law and meaning of consent” at the end of the first sentence in subsection B.

The 2017 amendment by c. 692 added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 383 added subsection C.

The 2018 amendment by c. 519 inserted “including sexual harassment using electronic means” in subsection B; and added subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 372, in subsection B, inserted the designation for clause (i), and substituted the designation for clause (ii) for “may incorporate age-appropriate elements of effective and evidence-based programs on.”

The 2019 amendment by c. 595 inserted “and human trafficking” in subsection B; and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment by c. 596 added subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 459 substituted “Board’s” for “Board of Education’s” in subsection A; and added “in any such curriculum offered in high school, human trafficking of children” in subsection E at the end; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-207.2.
Right of parents to review certain materials; summaries distributed.

Every parent, guardian or other person in the Commonwealth having control or charge of any child who is required by subsection A of § 22.1-254 to send such child to a public school shall have the right to review the complete family life curricula, including all supplemental materials used in any family life education program. A complete copy of all printed materials not subject to copyright protection and a description of all audio-visual materials shall be made available through any available parental portal and kept in the school library or office and made available for review to any parent or guardian during school office hours before and during the school year. The audio-visual materials shall be made available to parents for in-person review, upon request, on the same basis as printed materials are made available.

Each school board shall develop and distribute to the parents or guardians of a student participating in the family life education program and post for public viewing on the local school division’s official website a summary designed to assist parents in understanding the program implemented in its school division as such program progresses and to encourage parental guidance and involvement in the instruction of the students. Such information shall reflect the curricula of the program as taught in the classroom. The school division shall include the following information on the summary:

“Parents and guardians have the right to review the family life education program offered by their school division, including written and audio-visual educational materials used in the program. Parents and guardians also have the right to excuse their child from all or part of family life education instruction.”

History.

1989, c. 515; 1991, cc. 139, 526; 2009, c. 451; 2020, c. 689.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “subsection A of § 22.1-254” was substituted for “§ 22.1-254 A.”

Acts 2020, c. 689, cl. 2 provides: “That each local school board shall implement the provisions of this act no later than the start of the 2021-2022 school year.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 451, in the second paragraph, in the first sentence, deleted “when so requested by an individual parent or guardian of a student participating in the family life education program” preceding “distribute” and substituted “the parents or guardians of a student participating in the family life education program” for “that parent or guardian” and added the last sentence; and added the last paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 689, in the first paragraph, inserted “not subject to copyright protection” and “made available through any available parental portal and” in the second sentence and “in-person” in the last sentence; and in the second paragraph, inserted “and post for public viewing on the local school division’s official website” in the first sentence.

Law Review.

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

§ 22.1-207.2:1.
Anti-bullying or suicide prevention materials; parental right to review.

Each school board shall develop and implement policies that ensure that parents have the right to review any audio-visual materials that contain graphic sexual or violent content used in any anti-bullying or suicide prevention program. Such policies shall require that prior to using any such material, the parent of the child participating in such a program shall be provided written notice of his right to review the material and his right to excuse his child from participating in the part of such program utilizing such material.

History.

2019, c. 581.

§ 22.1-207.2:2.
(Effective until August 1, 2023) School Breakfast Program and National School Lunch Program; web-based application.

Each local school board that collects information to determine eligibility for participation in the School Breakfast Program or the National School Lunch Program administered by the U.S. Department of Agriculture shall establish and post prominently on its website a web-based application for student participation in such program and shall continue to provide a paper-based application.

History.

2019, c. 228.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2019 act having been § 22.1-207.2:1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 228, cl. 2 provides: “That any school board in establishing a web-based application to comply with the provisions of this act may adopt the U.S. Department of Agriculture’s Web-Based Prototype Application for Free and Reduced Price School Meals or may digitize its existing paper-based application.”

Acts
2022, c. 424, cl. 2 provides: “That school divisions that cannot currently comply with the requirements set forth in the first enactment of this act shall develop a plan for ensuring compliance by August 1, 2023.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 424, effective August 1, 2023, inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B.

§ 22.1-207.2:2.
(Effective August 1, 2023) School Breakfast Program and National School Lunch Program; applications.

Each local school board that collects information to determine eligibility for participation in the School Breakfast Program or the National School Lunch Program administered by the U.S. Department of Agriculture shall establish and post prominently on its website a web-based application for student participation in such program and shall continue to provide a paper-based application.

Each public elementary or secondary school shall process each web-based or paper-based application for participation in the School Breakfast Program or the National School Lunch Program administered by the U.S. Department of Agriculture within six working days after the date of receipt of the completed application.

History.

2019, c. 228; 2022, c. 424.

§ 22.1-207.3.
School breakfast programs.

Upon the appropriation and authorization of federal funds for the reimbursement of school breakfast programs, each school board shall establish a school breakfast program in any public school in which 25 percent or more of enrolled school-age children were approved eligible to receive free or reduced price meals in the federally funded lunch program during the previous school year.

The Board shall promulgate regulations for the implementation of the program. Such regulations shall include, but not be limited to, criteria for eligibility and exemptions; a reporting system for the compilation and analysis of information concerning the number and socioeconomic characteristics of participating school-age children; standards for food services; program evaluation; the investigation of complaints; an appeals process; notification of parents and guardians of the availability of the school breakfast program; and provision to teachers, children, and their parents or guardians of nutrition information describing the relationship between good nutrition, learning, and health.

Each school board subject to the provisions of this section shall develop and implement a plan to ensure compliance with the provisions of subsection A and submit the plan to the Department no later than 30 days prior to the commencement of the program. Each school board shall annually report such information as required in subsection B to the Department on such forms and in the manner to be prescribed by the Board. In the event that federal funding for school breakfast programs is reduced or eliminated, a school board may support the program with such state or local funds as may be appropriated for such purposes.

History.

1993, c. 698; 2022, c. 355.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 deleted “By July 1, 1994” in subsection A at the beginning; deleted “of Education” following “Board” in subsection B; in subsection C, deleted “of Education” following “Department” twice, deleted “Beginning by June 30, 1995, and thereafter annually” in the second sentence at the beginning, and inserted “annually” in the second sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-207.3:1.
Distribution of excess food.

As used in this section, “excess food” means any remaining unexpired, unopened, and unconsumed food intended to be served as part of a reimbursable meal that was unable to be utilized for a current or future meal provision after a school has served breakfast and lunch to students during a school day.

Each school board may distribute excess food to enrolled students eligible for the School Breakfast Program or National School Lunch Program administered by the U.S. Department of Agriculture who the school board determines are eligible to receive excess food.

The method by which a school board distributes excess food shall be established by the school board in accordance with the U.S. Department of Agriculture and the U.S. Food and Drug Administration requirements and guidelines for the distribution of excess food.

A school board may develop a policy describing the process for distributing excess food under this section, saving excess food for later consumption, or donating excess food.

History.

2020, c. 574.

§ 22.1-207.4.
Nutritional guidelines for competitive foods.

For purposes of this section, “competitive food” means any food, excluding beverages, sold to students on school grounds during regular school hours that is not part of the school breakfast or school lunch program.

The Board, in cooperation with the Department of Health, shall promulgate regulations setting nutritional guidelines for all competitive foods.

The Board, with assistance from the Department of Health, shall periodically review the nutritional guidelines for competitive foods to ensure that they remain current and science-based and shall also review the nutritional guidelines upon changes to federal law or regulations for competitive foods.

The regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall include but not be limited to: calorie, fat, sugar, and sodium content.

The regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall permit each public school to conduct on school grounds during regular school hours no more than 30 school-sponsored fundraisers per school year, during which food that does not meet the nutrition guidelines for competitive foods may be sold to students.

History.

2010, c. 718; 2015, c. 568.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 718, cl. 2 provides: “That in promulgating its regulations pursuant to this act, the Board of Education shall adopt either the Alliance for a Healthier Generation’s Competitive Foods Guidelines or the Institute of Medicine’s Recommended Standards for Competitive Foods in Schools as the initial statewide standard for competitive foods.”

Acts 2010, c. 718, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Education shall work with the Department of Health, the School Nutrition Association of Virginia, the American Heart Association, the American Cancer Society, the American Academy of Pediatrics, Virginia Chapter, the Virginia Wholesalers and Distributors Association, the Virginia Automatic Merchandising Association, and other stakeholders to conduct any research necessary for the development of the regulations and dissemination of the guidelines to each local school division.”

Acts 2010, c. 718, cl. 4 provides: “That the Board of Education shall report to the General Assembly on the status of the final regulations by December 1, 2011. The report shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports.”

Acts 2010, c. 718, cl. 5 provides: “That each local school board shall adopt the state guidelines as part of their existing local wellness policy to ensure compliance with the provisions of subsection A [now subsection B] of § 22.1-207.4 of the Code of Virginia.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 568 redesignated the former last paragraph as subsection A and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; deleted “sold to students during regular school hours” at the end of subsection B.

§ 22.1-207.4:1.
Participation in the Community Eligibility Provision.

As used in this section:“Identified student” means any student who is directly certified for free meals through means other than the use of an individual household application.“Identified student” includes (i) any student who is directly certified for free meals based on the student’s participation in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) or Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) or based on Medicaid income data and (ii) any homeless, runaway, migrant, or Head Start student, or any foster child, who is approved as categorically eligible for free meals by means other than a meal application.“Identified student percentage” means the fraction, expressed as a percentage, that results from dividing the number of identified students enrolled in a public elementary or secondary school by the total number of students enrolled in such school.

Each school board that governs a local school division that contains any public elementary or secondary school that has a minimum identified student percentage of 40 percent in the prior school year and is consequently eligible to participate in the Community Eligibility Provision (CEP) administered by the U.S. Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service (FNS) shall apply to FNS to participate in CEP for each such school, pursuant to FNS guidelines, by submitting (i) identified student data to FNS by April 1, unless an extension is in effect and (ii) its completed application to FNS by June 30, unless an extension is in effect.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any school board from grouping elementary or secondary schools in the local school division and applying to FNS to participate in CEP for such group of schools.

The Superintendent for Public Instruction shall issue a waiver to the requirement set forth in subsection B in the sole circumstance that an evaluation of a school or group of schools that is eligible to participate in CEP determines that participation in CEP is not financially viable to such school or group of schools. The Department of Education shall develop a process and criteria for considering such waivers, including a process and criteria for conducting such CEP evaluations.

History.

2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2.

Effective date.

This section is effective March 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 22.1-207.4:2.
Participation in the Afterschool Meal Program.

As used in this section:“At-risk afterschool care center” includes locations that offer educational or enrichment activities to children or teenagers, including schools, community centers, and libraries, approved by the Department to operate the Program.“Program” means the Afterschool Meal Program administered by the U.S. Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service (FNS) Child and Adult Care Food Program (CACFP).

Each school board that governs a local school division that contains any public elementary or secondary school that has a student population that qualifies for free and reduced-price meals at a minimum percentage of 50 percent in the prior school year and simultaneously offers educational or enrichment activities and is consequently eligible to participate in the Program shall apply to the Department to participate in the Program for each such school to subsequently and simultaneously serve federally reimbursable meals and offer an afterschool education or enrichment program, pursuant to FNS guidelines and state health and safety standards. The Department shall administer the Program on behalf of the U.S. Department of Agriculture and shall conduct the processes for application to the Program, approval for participation in the Program, and monitoring of schools participating in the Program.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any school in the local school division from applying to the Department to participate in the Program if that school offers afterschool programs that:

Provide organized and regularly scheduled afterschool activities for children after school or on the weekends, holidays, or breaks during the regular school year;

Include educational or enrichment activities such as arts and crafts, computer lessons, or homework assistance; and

Are located in an area that meets eligibility requirements for participation in the Program, pursuant to FNS guidelines.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any school in the local school division from partnering with agencies or organizations that participate in the Program, which partnership may include sponsoring at-risk afterschool care centers that operate at the school or at a location outside of the school and that already participate in the Program, to satisfy the requirements set forth in subsection B.

Any school may contact the Department for assistance in determining if a school or an afterschool program meets the requirements for eligibility to participate in the Program.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall issue a waiver to the requirement set forth in subsection B in the sole circumstance that an evaluation of a school or group of schools that is eligible to participate in the Program determines that participation in the program is not financially viable to such school or group of schools. The Department shall develop a process and criteria for considering such waivers, including a process and criteria for conducting such Program evaluations.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 292.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess, I, c. 292, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2022.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2022.

§ 22.1-207.5.
Instruction in American Sign Language.

As used in this section, “American Sign Language” means the natural language recognized globally that is used by members of the deaf community and that is linguistically complete with unique rules for language structure and use that include phonology, morphology, syntax, semantics, and discourse.

If a local school board offers one or more elective courses in American Sign Language, such school board shall (i) grant academic credit for successful completion of an American Sign Language course on the same basis as the successful completion of a foreign language course and (ii) count completion of an American Sign Language course toward the fulfillment of any foreign language requirement for graduation.

If a local school board does not offer any elective course in American Sign Language, such school board shall (i) grant academic credit for successful completion of an American Sign Language course offered by a comprehensive community college or a multidivision online provider approved by the Board on the same basis as the successful completion of a foreign language course and (ii) count completion of any such American Sign Language course toward the fulfillment of any foreign language requirement for graduation.

History.

2011, c. 762; 2018, c. 481.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 481 designated the existing provisions as subsections A and B, and added subsection C; added “As used in this section” at the beginning of subsection A; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-207.6.
Military-connected students; National Math and Science Initiative.

The Department of Education shall encourage school boards of school divisions that have a significant number of enrolled military-connected students to partner with the National Math and Science Initiative to provide such students with the tools and resources necessary to advance science, technology, engineering, and mathematics learning opportunities and career readiness. The Department shall provide technical assistance to any school board seeking to enter into such a partnership, upon request.

History.

2019, c. 772.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 772 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 22.1-207.7.
4-H educational programs and activities; attendance.

No student who misses a partial or full day of school while participating in a 4-H educational program or activity shall be counted as absent for the purposes of calculating average daily membership and each such student shall receive course credit in the same manner as he would for a school field trip, provided that:

Each local school board shall develop policies and procedures for such students to make up missed work;

Each local school board may determine the maximum number of school days per academic year that a student may spend participating in 4-H educational programs or activities to not be counted absent; and

No school shall provide course credit to a student pursuant this section if the student’s participation in a 4-H educational program or activity occurs during scheduled Standards of Learning assessments or during any period of time that the student is suspended or expelled from school.

Upon request from a school principal or an assistant principal, an agent or representative from 4-H shall provide documentation as proof of a student’s participation in an activity or program sponsored by 4-H.

History.

2022, cc. 59, 58.

§ 22.1-208.
Emphasis on moral education.

The entire scheme of instruction in the public schools shall emphasize moral education through lessons given by teachers and imparted by appropriate reading selections.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-238; 1980, c. 559.